Washington statutes.
RCW 16.04.100

Trespass via fence damaged by wildlife.

If damages are caused by a trespassing animal, neither the state nor the owner of the animal shall be liable if the owner of the animal can prove that the trespass is due to damage caused by wildlife to a lawful fence and, in a stock restricted area, the owner of the animal did not have a reasonable opportunity to repair the fence. The state shall pay all costs of transportation, advertising, legal proceedings, and keep of an animal that has been restrained pursuant to RCW 16.04.010. Claims filed under this section shall be processed according to the procedures under chapter 4.92 RCW.

[ 1994 c 263 s 3.]